Arkansas, session 2025, HB1101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) GOV42G GOV MANSION ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SPC09
(2) GOV41G GOV CHEF 1 GRADE SGS11
(3) GOV39G GOV HORTICULTURALIST 1 GRADE SGS08
(4) GOV44G GOV MANSION EVENTS MANAGER 1 GRADE SGS07
(5) GOV40G GOV FOOD SERVICES EXPERT 2 GRADE SGS05
(6) GOV38G GOV EXECUTIVE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS05
*JAR012*
04-07-2025 14:43:52 JAR012

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1101
(7) GOV43G GOV MAINTENANCE MANAGER 1 GRADE SGS02
(8) GOV45G GOV MANSION EVENTS AIDE 1 GRADE SGS04
(9) GOV46G GOV MANSION EVENTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS05
MAX NO. OF EMPLOYEES 10

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: four
(4) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission, to be payable from the State
Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $654,450
(02) EXTRA HELP 12,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 224,124
(04) GOV MANSION ALLOWANCE 60,000
(05) GOV MANSION OPERATING EXPENSES 201,830
(06) GOV MANSION ANNUAL MAINTENANCE 112,846
(07) GOV MANSION UTILITIES 235,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,500,250

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - GRAND HALL/MANSION/GROUNDS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for expenses of the Arkansas Governor's Mansion,
Grand Hall and grounds of the Arkansas Governor's Mansion for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:
04-07-2025 14:43:52 JAR012

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1101

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRAND HALL/MANSION/GROUNDS EXP $500,000

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ARKANSAS GOVERNOR'S MANSION - CASH FUND. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall at each end of the fiscal year cause to be transferred into the
State Central Services Fund the excess of the Arkansas Governor's Mansion -
Cash Fund over $300,000 to defray state support for related purposes,
including, but not limited to personal services and operating expenses, as
required to carry out the functions, powers and duties of the Arkansas
Governor's Mansion pursuant to A.C.A. §22-3-801 - 806.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

04-07-2025 14:43:52 JAR012

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1101
SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee























04-07-2025 14:43:52 JAR012